Utah statutes.
77-7-22.   Failure to appear as misdemeanor.
Any person who willfully fails to appear before a court pursuant to a citation
issued under the provisions of Section 77-7-18 is guilty of a class B
misdemeanor, regardless of the disposition of the charge upon which he was
originally cited.
